test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-okiwimaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - okâwîmâw - ok : # -m dep. animate noun, mother, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 140

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikâwiy
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikâwiy
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwiya
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: okâwiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikâwinân
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikâwinaw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikâwiwâw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: okâwiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikâwiyak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikâwiyak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwiya
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: okâwiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikâwinânak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikâwinawak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikâwiwâwak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: okâwiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikâwisis
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikâwisis
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwisisa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikâwisisinân
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikâwisisinaw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikâwisisiwâw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwisisiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikâwisisak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikâwisisak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwisisa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikâwisisinânak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikâwisisinawak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikâwisisiwâwak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwisisiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nikâmihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kikâmihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: okâmihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: okâmiyihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nikâminânihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kikâminâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kikâmiwâwihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: okâmiwâwihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: okâmiyihk

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nikâwisisihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kikâwisisihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: okâwisisihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: okâwisisiyihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nikâwisisinânihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kikâwisisinâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kikâwisisiwâwihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: okâwisisiwâwihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: okâwisisiyihk
